District of Columbia statutes.
31-3451.04

Regulatory Action Level Event.

(a)

If a Regulatory Action Level Event occurs, the Commissioner shall:

(1)

Require the health organization to prepare and submit an RBC plan or, if applicable, a revised RBC plan;

(2)

Perform such examination or analysis as the Commissioner considers necessary of the assets, liabilities, and operations of the health organization, including a review of its RBC plan or revised RBC plan; and

(3)

Issue a corrective order.

(b)

In determining corrective action, the Commissioner may consider factors which include the results of any sensitivity tests undertaken under the RBC instructions. The RBC plan or revised RBC plan shall be submitted:

(1)

Within 45 days after the occurrence of the Regulatory Action Level Event;

(2)

If the health organization challenges an adjusted RBC report under § 31-3451.07, and the challenge is not frivolous in the judgment of the Commissioner, within 45 days after the notification to the health organization that the Commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the health organization’s challenge; or

(3)

If the health organization challenges a revised RBC plan under § 31-3451.07, and the challenge is not frivolous in the judgment of the Commissioner, within 45 days after the notification to the health organization that the Commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the health organization’s challenge.

(c)

The Commissioner may retain actuaries, investment experts, or other consultants as may be necessary in the judgment of the Commissioner to review the health organization’s RBC plan or revised RBC plan, examine or analyze the assets, liabilities, and operations (including contractual relationships) of the health organization, and formulate the corrective order with respect to the health organization. The fees, costs, and expenses relating to the actuaries, investment experts, or consultants shall be borne by the affected health organization or such other party as directed by the Commissioner.

History

June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 104, 50 DCR 306

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3451.05 and § 31-3451.13.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 31-3851.04.